Wisconsin, session 2025, SB256.
do enact as follows:SB256,11Section 1. 71.05 (6) (a) 30. of the statutes is created to read:SB256,3,4271.05 (6) (a) 30. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, any 1amount distributed during the taxable year from a portable benefit account, as 2defined in s. 103.08 (1) (h), that was not used for a permissible use under s. 103.08 3(3), except that this subdivision applies only to amounts for which a subtraction was 4made under par. (b) 57.SB256,25Section 2. 71.05 (6) (b) 57. of the statutes is created to read:SB256,3,8671.05 (6) (b) 57. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, an 7amount equal to any contribution made during the taxable year to a portable 8benefit account, as defined in s. 103.08 (1) (h), by the owner of the account.SB256,39Section 3. 71.63 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB256,3,191071.63 (2) “Employee” means a resident individual who performs or performed 11services for an employer anywhere or a nonresident individual who performs or 12performed such services within this state, and includes an officer, employee or 13elected official of the United States, a state, territory, or any political subdivision 14thereof, or the District of Columbia, or any agency or instrumentality of any one or 15more of these entities. The term includes an officer of a corporation, an entertainer 16and an entertainment corporation, but does not include a direct seller who is not 17treated as an employee under section 3508 of the Internal Revenue Code or, a real 18estate broker or salesperson who is excluded under s. 452.38, or an application-19based driver excluded under s. 102.07 (8) (bs).SB256,420Section 4. 71.83 (1) (f) of the statutes is created to read:SB256,4,22171.83 (1) (f) Portable benefit accounts. An owner of a portable benefit account, 22as defined in s. 103.08 (1) (h), who uses a distribution from the account for a 23purpose that is not a permissible use under s. 103.08 (3) is liable for a penalty equal 24to 10 percent of the amount of the distribution not used for a permissible use. The 1department shall assess, levy, and collect the penalty under this paragraph in the 2same manner as it assesses, levies, and collects taxes under this chapter.SB256,53Section 5. 102.01 (2) (ae) of the statutes is created to read:SB256,4,64102.01 (2) (ae) “Application-based driver” means a delivery network courier or 5participating driver who provides services through the digital network of a network 6company.SB256,67Section 6. 102.01 (2) (an) of the statutes is created to read:SB256,4,108102.01 (2) (an) “Delivery network company” means a business that uses a 9digital network to connect customers to application-based drivers to facilitate 10delivery services.SB256,711Section 7. 102.01 (2) (ann) of the statutes is created to read:SB256,4,1312102.01 (2) (ann) “Delivery network courier” means an individual who provides 13delivery services through a delivery network company’s digital network.SB256,814Section 8. 102.01 (2) (anp) of the statutes is created to read:SB256,4,2115102.01 (2) (anp) “Delivery services” means the fulfillment of a delivery 16request by picking up from any location any item and delivering the item, by using 17a passenger vehicle, a bicycle, a scooter, public transportation, or other similar 18means of transportation or by walking, to a location selected by the customer that is 19typically located within 50 miles of the pickup location. “Delivery services” includes 20the selection, collection, or purchase of items by a delivery network courier, as well 21as other tasks incidental to the delivery.SB256,922Section 9. 102.01 (2) (ant) of the statutes is created to read:SB256,4,2323102.01 (2) (ant) “Digital network” has the meaning given in s. 103.08 (1) (c).SB256,101Section 10. 102.01 (2) (dc) of the statutes is created to read:SB256,5,32102.01 (2) (dc) “Network company” means a delivery network company or a 3transportation network company.SB256,114Section 11. 102.01 (2) (ds) of the statutes is created to read:SB256,5,55102.01 (2) (ds) “Participating driver” has the meaning given in s. 440.40 (3).SB256,126Section 12. 102.01 (2) (gh) of the statutes is created to read:SB256,5,87102.01 (2) (gh) “Transportation network company” has the meaning given in 8s. 440.40 (6).SB256,139Section 13. 102.07 (8) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB256,5,1410102.07 (8) (a) Except as provided in pars. (b) and, (bm), and (bs), every 11independent contractor is, for the purpose of this chapter, an employee of any 12employer under this chapter for whom he or she is performing service in the course 13of the trade, business, profession or occupation of such employer at the time of the 14injury.SB256,1415Section 14. 102.07 (8) (bs) of the statutes is created to read:SB256,5,1716102.07 (8) (bs) An application-based driver is not an employee or agent of a 17network company if the company refrains from doing all of the following:SB256,5,20181. Prescribing specific dates, times of day, or a minimum number of hours 19during which the application-based driver must be logged into the network 20company’s online-enabled application, software, or system.SB256,5,23212. Terminating the contract of the application-based driver for not accepting a 22specific delivery service request or request for transportation, except as prohibited 23by s. 440.45 (2).SB256,6,313. Restricting the application-based driver from performing services through 2other network companies except while performing services through that network 3company.SB256,6,544. Restricting the application-based driver from working in any other lawful 5occupation or business.SB256,156Section 15. 103.08 of the statutes is created to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb256 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb256 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB256 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB256 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB256: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting